Florida, session 2026, HB1273.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (12) of section
1009.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1009.26 Fee waivers.—
(12)(a) A state university, a Florida College System
institution, a career center operated by a school district under
s. 1001.44, or a charter technical career center shall waive
out-of-state fees for students, including, but not limited to,
students who are undocumented for federal immigration purposes,
who are citizens of the United States or lawfully present in the
United States who meet the following conditions:
1. Attended a secondary school in this state for 3
consecutive years immediately before graduating from a high
school in this state;
2. Apply for enrollment in an institution of higher
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1273-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1273 2026
education within 24 months after high school graduation; and
3. Submit an official Florida high school transcript as
evidence of attendance and graduation.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1273-00